Hawaii statutes.
§633-8 Order to show cause. [Repeal
and reenactment on June 30, 2020. L 2015, c 101, §4.] Upon the filing of
a complaint with a copy of a lease or rental contract and an affidavit sworn to
by the plaintiff or some competent affiant setting forth a statement of facts
sufficient to show that the leased or rented personal property has been in the
defendant's possession at least fourteen days after the termination of the
lease or rental contract, either by passage of time or by reason of any default
under the terms and conditions of the lease or rental contract, the court may
issue an order directing the defendant to either return the leased or rented
personal property to the plaintiff or to appear and show cause for the
possession at such time as the court shall direct, but not later than five days
from the date of service of the order to show cause. The order to show cause
shall also provide that, if the leased or rented personal property is not
returned to the plaintiff prior to the hearing, the defendant shall, if
reasonably feasible, produce the property at the hearing. If, at the hearing,
it is proved to the satisfaction of the court that the plaintiff is entitled to
possession of the leased or rented personal property, it shall issue an order
directed to the sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, or independent civil
process server from the department of public safety's list under section
353C-10 commanding the sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, or independent
civil process server to seize the personal property therein described and to
deliver the same to the plaintiff or the plaintiff's agent. Service of the
order to show cause shall be as provided by law or rule of court for cases in
the district courts, or by registered mail or by certified mail with return
receipt showing delivery within the circuit. [L 1980, c 171, §2; am L 1981, c
176, §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 281, §11; am L 2012,
c 142, §5; am L 2013, c 116, §§7, 25(6)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next